Washington statutes.
RCW 36.32.253

Competitive bids—Leases of personal property.

No lease of personal property may be entered into by the county legislative authority or by any elected or appointed officer of the county except upon use of the procedures specified in this chapter and chapter 39.04 RCW for awarding contracts for purchases when it leases personal property from the lowest responsible bidder.

[ 1993 c 198 s 6; 1991 c 363 s 63.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—1991 c 363: See notes following RCW 2.32.180.